Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 8
MEDICATION-ASSISTED TREATMENT (MAT)
EXPANSION PILOT PROGRAM

Law reviews:

For article, "Medication Assisted Treatment in Drug

C

ourt", see 46

C

olo. Law. 20 (July 2017).

23-21-801. Short title.

The short title of this part 8 is the "Medication-assisted Treatment Expansion Pilot Program Act".

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 870, § 1, effective May 22.

23-21-802. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

In an effort to address the growing opioid addiction problem throughout the nation, on July 22, 2016, President Obama signed into law the federal "Comprehensive Addiction and Recovery Act of 2016", also referred to as "CARA";

CARA authorizes qualified nurse practitioners and physician assistants in community- and office-based practice settings to prescribe certain medications used in the treatment of opioid addiction as a means of increasing access to treatment for opioid-dependent patients;

Opioid addiction has emerged as a significant public health concern in Colorado, with over ten thousand deaths attributed to drug overdose since 2000 and the annual rate of drug overdose deaths doubling from 7.8 deaths per one hundred thousand people in 2000 to 15.7 deaths per one hundred thousand people in 2015, a rate significantly higher than the national rate;

Southeast Colorado comprises six percent of the state's population and accounts for eighteen percent of admissions for heroin treatment, the Pueblo county jail sees over one thousand seven hundred opioid protocol prisoners each year, and the Pueblo fire department used an opioid antagonist to halt an opioid-related drug overdose event one hundred forty times in 2015;

In Routt county, drug overdose death rates have increased nearly six-fold from 2014 to 2016, and over sixty-five percent of these deaths were related to prescription opioids;

Despite the prevalence of opioid addiction and opioid-related overdose events in Pueblo and Routt counties, only three doctors in Pueblo county and one doctor in Routt county are able to provide medication-assisted treatment to opioid-dependent patients in those counties;

Medication-assisted treatment, which includes the use of medication and behavioral therapies to treat individuals with opioid addictive disorders:

Has proven to be clinically effective and to significantly reduce the need for inpatient detoxification services for individuals with opioid addictive disorders;

Provides a comprehensive, individually tailored program of treatment for opioid-dependent patients;

Is intended to achieve full recovery;

Can contribute to lowering a person's risk of contracting HIV or hepatitis C by reducing the potential for relapse; and

Has improved patient survival rates, increased retention in treatment, decreased illicit opioid use and other criminal activity among individuals with substance abuse disorders, increased patients' ability to attain and retain employment, and improved birth outcomes among pregnant women who have substance use disorders;

In order to increase access to addiction treatment in areas of the state where opioid addiction is prevalent, it is necessary to establish a pilot program to award grants to:

Organizations or practices with nurse practitioners and physician assistants to enable them to obtain the training and ongoing support required to prescribe medications, such as buprenorphine and all other medications and therapies approved by the federal food and drug administration, to treat opioid use disorders; and

Community agencies to provide behavioral therapies, in conjunction with medication treatment, to treat individuals with opioid use disorders; and

Since the pilot program will provide access to treatment to individuals with substance use disorders, the use of retail marijuana tax revenues to fund the pilot program is authorized under section 39-28.8-501 (2)(b)(IV)(C).

The general assembly further finds that:

Since its creation, the pilot program has achieved numerous successes toward program goals as follows:

With regard to the program goal of increasing the number of advanced practice providers able to prescribe medications to treat individuals with opioid use disorders in Pueblo and Routt counties:

Two medication-assisted treatment (MAT) programs in Pueblo county were selected to receive funding and one MAT program was started in Routt county;

As of August 2018, four providers certified to prescribe MAT medications were added to the two MAT programs in Pueblo county and six MAT medication-certified prescribers are available in the Routt county program; and

Through July 1, 2018, fifty providers received education on opioid use disorders and related issues in assessment and treatment; and

With regard to the program goal of increasing access to MAT services in Pueblo and Routt counties:

Pueblo county increased MAT services from a total of ninety-nine clients treated through its two MAT programs in 2017 to five hundred seventy-six clients treated through the two programs through October 2018; and

Routt county had very limited MAT services available in 2017 and, through October of 2018, provided MAT services through its new MAT program to fifty clients;

Given the successes of the program in expanding access to MAT services in Pueblo and Routt counties, the pilot program should be extended and made available to additional areas of the state that are experiencing significant public health concerns due to the prevalence of opioid addiction and overdose incidences and inadequate numbers of providers;

In the San Luis valley, which has approximately fifty thousand residents and consists of the counties of Alamosa, Conejos, Costilla, Custer, Huerfano, Mineral, Rio Grande, and Saguache, opioid overdoses have been increasing since 2010, with recent reports of more than ten overdoses per one hundred thousand in population yearly in each of the counties in the valley;

Huerfano county, which has about six thousand six hundred residents, had six overdose deaths in 2016, a rate of 152.6 per one hundred thousand in population, which was the highest overdose rate for any county in the state;

Many other counties in the state are also experiencing high incidences of overdose and lack available, qualified providers to meet the addiction treatment needs in the county;

Given the prevalence of opioid overdoses in the San Luis valley and other areas of the state, it is necessary to extend the pilot program established pursuant to this part 8 for an additional two years, expand its availability to critical-need areas of the state, and increase its funding in order to increase access to addiction treatment in these areas where opioid addiction and overdose incidences are at significant levels.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 870, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(2) added, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2002, § 1, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For section 303 of the federal "Comprehensive Addiction and Recovery Act of 2016", see Pub.L. 114-198.

23-21-803. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory board" means the MAT expansion advisory board created in section 23-21-805.

(1.5) "Center" means the center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies established pursuant to section 27-80-118.

"College of nursing" means the college of nursing at the university of Colorado Anschutz medical campus, operated by the board of regents of the university of Colorado.

"Federal act" means section 303 of the federal "Comprehensive Addiction and Recovery Act of 2016", Pub.L. 114-198.

"Medication-assisted treatment" or "MAT" means a combination of behavioral therapy and medications, such as buprenorphine and all other medications and therapies, approved by the federal food and drug administration to treat opioid use disorder.

"Nurse practitioner" means an advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in section 12-255-104 (1), who is listed on the advanced practice registry in accordance with section 12-255-111 and is authorized by the state board of nursing in accordance with section 12-255-112 to prescribe controlled substances and prescription drugs.

"Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant by the Colorado medical board in accordance with section 12-240-113 who is authorized, in accordance with section 12-240-107 (6), to perform acts constituting the practice of medicine, including prescribing controlled substances, and who is under the supervision of a physician trained in MAT.

"Pilot program" or "MAT expansion pilot program" means the medication-assisted treatment expansion pilot program created in section 23-21-804.

"Pilot program area" means the areas of the state in which the pilot program is available, as specified in section 23-21-804 (1)(b).

"Qualified nurse practitioner or physician assistant" means a nurse practitioner or physician assistant who is a qualifying practitioner, as defined in the federal act and regulations adopted under the federal act, and is registered in accordance with 21 U.S.C. sec. 823 (g).

"San Luis valley" means the counties of Alamosa, Conejos, Costilla, Custer, Huerfano, Mineral, Rio Grande, and Saguache.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 872, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(1.5) and (10) added, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2003, § 2, effective May 14; (5) and (6) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1684, § 120, effective October 1.

23-21-804. Medication-assisted treatment expansion pilot program - created - pilot program location - eligible grant recipients - rules.

There is hereby created the medication-assisted treatment expansion pilot program to provide grants to community agencies, office-based practices, behavioral health organizations, and substance abuse treatment organizations to enable:

Nurse practitioners or physician assistants working in those settings to obtain training and ongoing support required under the federal act in order to prescribe buprenorphine and all other medications and therapies approved by the federal food and drug administration as part of medication-assisted treatment provided to individuals with an opioid use disorder; and

Those agencies, practices, and organizations to provide behavioral therapies and support in conjunction with medication-assisted treatment for individuals with an opioid use disorder.

The MAT expansion pilot program is available to provide grants to community agencies, office-based practices, behavioral health organizations, and substance abuse treatment organizations practicing or providing treatment in Pueblo county or Routt county, and, starting in the 2019-20 fiscal year, the San Luis valley and up to two additional counties selected by the center for participation based on demonstrated need.

A grant recipient may use the money received through the pilot program for the following purposes:

To enable nurse practitioners or physician assistants practicing or working in the grant recipient's setting in the pilot program area to obtain the training required to be a qualified nurse practitioner or physician assistant in order to prescribe buprenorphine and all other medications and therapies approved by the federal food and drug administration as part of medication-assisted treatment for individuals with opioid use disorders; and

To increase access to medication-assisted treatment for individuals with opioid use disorders in the pilot program area.

The center shall administer the MAT expansion pilot program and, subject to available appropriations, shall award grants as provided in this part 8. Subject to available appropriations, grants shall be paid out of money annually appropriated for the pilot program as provided in section 23-21-808.

The center shall implement the MAT expansion pilot program in accordance with this part 8 and shall develop, with assistance from and in coordination with the advisory board, pilot program guidelines and procedures as necessary to implement the pilot program, including guidelines and procedures specifying the time frames for applying for grants; the form of the pilot program grant application; the time frames for distributing grant money, technical assistance, and consultation to grant recipients; and evaluation of the pilot program.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 873, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(1)(b), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2004, § 3, effective May 14.

23-21-805. MAT expansion advisory board - created - duties.

There is hereby created in the center the MAT expansion advisory board, which shall:

Review and approve pilot program guidelines and procedures;

Advise and provide assistance to the center on the implementation of the pilot program;

Review and make recommendations to the center on grant applications, including recommendations for grant award amounts;

Assist the center in evaluating the pilot program; and

Perform other tasks, as requested by the center, related to the implementation and administration of the pilot program.

The advisory board consists of representatives of the following entities or organizations who are designated by the entity or organization:

The college of nursing;

The state substance abuse trend and response task force created in section 18-18.5-103;

The Colorado consortium for prescription drug abuse prevention, administered under the center at the university of Colorado Anschutz medical campus;

The Colorado Nurses Association;

The Colorado Academy of Physician Assistants; and

The physician assistant program at the university of Colorado.

In addition to the members specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section, representatives from counties participating in the pilot program area, appointed as follows, shall serve on the advisory board:

The Northwest Colorado Community Health Partnership in Routt county shall appoint a medical or public health professional from Routt county;

The Pueblo county heroin task force shall appoint a medical or public health professional from Pueblo county;

Valley-wide Health Systems, Inc., shall appoint a medical professional from the San Luis valley;

The San Luis Valley Area Health Education Center shall appoint a medical or public health professional from the San Luis valley;

The Colorado Association of Local Public Health Officials shall appoint a public health professional from the San Luis valley;

If additional counties are selected to participate in the pilot program, the center shall determine the appointing authority for and type of professional from each participating county;

The board of county commissioners for each county participating in the pilot program, including additional counties that may be selected to participate pursuant to section 23-21-804 (1)(b), shall appoint a member of its board; except that, for the San Luis valley, the boards of county commissioners of the counties in the San Luis valley shall jointly appoint one member from one of the boards of county commissioners in the San Luis valley to serve on the advisory board; and

The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing shall appoint a representative from the department.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 874, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(1), (2)(a)(III), and (2)(b) amended, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2004, § 4, effective May 14.

23-21-806. Grant application - criteria - awards.

To receive a grant, an eligible organization or practice must submit an application to the center in accordance with pilot program guidelines and procedures established by the center. At a minimum, the application must include the following information:

A specific description of the need in the county served by the applicant, including data on the prevalence of opioid addiction, the overdose rate, and the provider capacity in the county;

The purpose for which the applicant will use the grant;

The amount of grant money requested;

The number of nurse practitioners or physician assistants willing to complete the required training;

Identification of any incentives to assist nurse practitioners or physician assistants in completing the required training and becoming certified to prescribe buprenorphine;

An agreement to institute policies and procedures for implementing medication-assisted treatment;

A description of how the applicant will achieve improved access to medication-assisted treatment in the pilot program area the applicant serves;

Identification of expected outcomes of care for opioid-dependent patients; and

An evaluation plan.

The advisory board shall review the applications received pursuant to this section and make recommendations to the center regarding grant recipients and awards. In recommending grant awards and in awarding grants, the advisory board and the center shall consider the following criteria:

The eligibility of the applicants;

The demonstrated need in the area served by the applicant;

The number of opioid-dependent patients that could be served by nurse practitioners or physician assistants working in or with a practice or organization applying for a grant;

The written commitment of the applicant to implement policies and procedures for providing MAT;

The written commitment of the applicant to have nurse practitioners or physician assistants participate in periodic consultations with center staff; and

The written commitment of the applicant to participate in the evaluation of the pilot program.

Subject to available appropriations, in the 2019-20 and 2020-21 fiscal years, the center shall award grants to applicants approved in accordance with this section and shall distribute the grant money to grant recipients within ninety days after issuing the grant awards.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 875, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(f), IP(2), (2)(d), and (3) amended and (1)(a.5) and (2)(a.5) added, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2005, § 5, effective May 14.

23-21-807. Reporting requirements.

Each organization or practice that receives a grant through the pilot program shall submit an annual report to the center by a date set by the center. At a minimum, the report must include the following information:

The amount of the grant and the date on which the grant was received;

An accounting of how the grant money was spent and whether any grant money was not expended;

The number of nurse practitioners or physician assistants who were trained and who received certification to prescribe buprenorphine and all other medications and therapies approved by the federal food and drug administration to treat opioid use disorder; and

A detailed description of the training received by nurse practitioners or physician assistants; whether the nurse practitioners or physician assistants completed the training and attained status as a qualified nurse practitioner or physician assistant; whether the nurse practitioners or physician assistants that attained qualified nurse practitioner or physician assistant status are currently able to provide and are providing medication-assisted treatment to opioid-dependent patients; the number of individuals with opioid use disorders treated in the previous two years before the pilot program; and the number of opioid-dependent patients treated during the pilot program period by each qualified nurse practitioner or physician assistant.

On or before June 30, 2018, and on or before each June 30 through June 30, 2021, the center shall submit a summarized report on the pilot program to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance and the public health care and human services committees of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and to the governor. At a minimum, the report must include:

A description of the pilot program, including a list of counties participating in the pilot program;

A list identifying the grant recipients, including the amount awarded to each grant recipient, the county in which the grant recipient is providing services, and a detailed description of how each grant recipient used the grant award;

The total number of nurse practitioners and physician assistants who completed the required training and became certified to prescribe buprenorphine, listed by county participating in the pilot program;

The total number of patients served during the course of the pilot program, listed by county participating in the pilot program;

A summary of policies and procedures instituted by grant recipients related to the provision of MAT by qualified nurse practitioners and physician assistants;

A summary of evaluation results of the pilot program; and

A summary of lessons learned and recommendations for implementing MAT as provided by nurse practitioners and physician assistants in other communities in the state.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 876, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

IP(1), IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(b) amended, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2006, § 6, effective May 14.

23-21-808. Funding for pilot program.

For state fiscal year 2021-22, and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall annually appropriate three million dollars per fiscal year from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 to the board of regents of the university of Colorado, for allocation to the center to implement and administer the MAT expansion pilot program. The center may use a portion of the money annually appropriated for the pilot program to pay the direct and indirect costs that the center incurs to administer the pilot program, as well as to provide consulting services to and oversight of grant recipients, for data collection and analysis, evaluation of the pilot program, and program reporting.

If any unexpended or uncommitted money appropriated for a fiscal year remains at the end of that fiscal year, the center may expend the money in accordance with this section in the succeeding fiscal year.

The center may accept and expend any gifts, grants, or donations it receives to implement or administer the pilot program.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 877, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2007, § 7, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2362, § 4, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-21-809. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (SB 17-074), ch. 226, p. 877, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-001), ch. 173, p. 2007, § 8, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2363, § 5, effective June 28.